Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-214
Missing Persons Information Clearinghouse; missing person report; unemancipated minor; law enforcement agency; duties.

(1) If a report of a missing person involves an unemancipated minor, the law enforcement agency shall immediately transmit the proper information for inclusion in the National Crime Information Center computer and the Missing Persons Information Clearinghouse.

(2) If a report of a missing person involves an unemancipated minor, a law enforcement agency shall not prevent an immediate active investigation on the basis of an agency rule which specifies an automatic time limitation for a missing person investigation.

Laws 1985, LB 187, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 111, § 3.

Missing Children Identification Act, see section 43-2001 et seq.